Hawaii statutes.
§147-78 Seller's invoice. Every
person, in selling eggs to a retailer, shall furnish to the retailer an invoice
showing the exact grade or quality and the size or weight of the eggs according
to the standards prescribed by the department of agriculture. A copy of the
invoice shall be kept on file by the person selling and by the retailer at
their respective places of business for a period of thirty days, and shall be
available for inspection at all reasonable times by accredited inspectors or
representatives of the department. [L 1931, c 70, §6; RL 1935, §1078; RL 1945,
§1309; am L 1955, c 167, §3; RL 1955, §22-76; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L
1961, c 132, §2; HRS §147-78]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next